src/deriv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+Abl +Able +Acc +Acquire +ActOf +Adamantly +Adj +Adverb
	+AfterDoingSo +Agt +Almost +Aor +AorPart +AsIf +AsLongAs +A1pl
	+A1sg +A2pl +A2sg +A3pl +A3sg +Become +ByDoingSo +Card +Caus
	+Cond +Conj +Continue +Cop +Dat +Demons +Desr +Det +Dim +Dist
	+Dup +Equ +EverSince +FeelLike +Fut +FutPart +Gen +Hastily +Imp
	+InBetween +Inf1 +Inf2 +Inf3 +Ins +Interj +JustLike +Loc +Ly
	+Narr +NarrPart +Neces +Neg +Ness +Nom +NotAbleState +NotState
	+Noun +Num +Opt +Ord +PCAbl +PCAcc +PCDat +PCGen +PCIns +PCNom
	+Pass +Past +PastPart +Pers +Pnon +Pos +Postp +Pres +PresPart
	+Prog1 +Prog2 +Pron +Prop +P1pl +P1sg +P2pl +P2sg +P3pl +P3sg
	+Quant +Ques +Recip +Reflex +Rel +Related +Repeat +Since
	+SinceDoingSo +Start +Stay +Verb +When +While +With +Without
	+WithoutBeingAbleToHaveDoneSo +WithoutHavingDoneSo +Zero ^DB
	+Narr2 +Past2 +Imp2 +WithoutHavingDoneSo2 
	^Vflect ^Vzero ^Nflect ^Nzero


LEXICON Root	
+Noun	Noun;
+Verb	Verb;
+Adj	Adj;


!! Derivations following Noun

LEXICON Noun
^Nflect			#;	!! describes all sequences except some derivations following +Nom
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	A3sg;	!! we should not have to specify no-inflection before derivation
+A3pl+Pnon+Nom:+lAr	A3pl;

LEXICON A3pl
^DB+Adj+InBetween:+arası	InBetween;
^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;	!! only with gunlerdir etc?

LEXICON A3sg
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+HmsH	JustLike;
^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;	!! only with gunlerdir etc?
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;


!! Derivations following Adj

LEXICON Adj
^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;	!! BUG: This should be +AsH or +msH or something.
^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;


!! Derivations following Verb (non-verb derivations)

LEXICON Vderiv
^DB+Adj+AorPart:+Hr	AorPart;
^DB+Adj+FeelLike:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	AdjPoss+Pnon;
^DB+Adj+NarrPart:+mHş	NarrPart;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+DHk	AdjPoss+Pnon;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	PresPart;
^DB+Adverb+Adamantly:+yAsHyA	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+DHkçA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+SinceDoingSo:+yAlH	Dat?;	!! No need?
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA		Dat?;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutBeingAbleToHaveDoneSo:+yAmAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn		#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo2:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf:+mAcA		ActOf;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike:+yAsH		FeelLike;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk		Nflect;	!! BUG: Pnon may not be possible
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk		Inf1;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA		Inf2;
^DB+Noun+Inf3:+yHş		Inf3;
^DB+Noun+NotAbleState:+yAmAzlHk	Nflect;	!! always ambig with +Verb^DB+Verb+Able+Neg^DB+Adj+AorPart^DB+Noun+Ness+A3sg+Pnon+Nom
^DB+Noun+NotState:+mAzlHk	Nflect;	!! always ambig with +Verb+Neg^DB+Adj+AorPart^DB+Noun+Ness+A3sg+Pnon+Nom
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+DHk		Nflect;	!! BUG: Pnon may not be possible

LEXICON VerbAgt
^DB+Adj+Agt:+yHcH	AgtAdj;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+yHcH	Agt;



!! After ^DB+Adj

LEXICON AgtAdj		!! Verb+yHcH
!^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Noun+Zero:0	NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON AorPart		!! Verb+Hr
^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON AsIf		!! Adj+CA
!^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;		!! BUG: Equ does not follow nouns derived from adjectives?
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON InBetween	!! Noun+lAr+arası
!^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON JustLike	!! Noun|Adj+sH
!^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON NarrPart	!! Verb+mHş
^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;		!! Do we ever need this?

LEXICON PresPart	!! Verb+yAn
^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON Rel		!! Noun+ki
	#;
!^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
!			Vzero?;

LEXICON Related		!! Noun+sAl
!^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON With		!! Noun+lH
^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;

LEXICON Without		!! Noun+sHz
^DB+Adj+AsIf:+CA	AsIf;
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
^DB+Adverb+Ly:+CA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
^DB+Noun+Zero:0		NounZero;
^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;
			Vzero?;


!! After ^DB+Noun

LEXICON ActOf		!! Verb+mAcA
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	ActOfA3sg;

LEXICON ActOfA3sg
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
!^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON Agt		!! (Noun|Verb|Adj)+CH
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	AgtA3sg;

LEXICON AgtA3sg
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
!^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON Dim		!! Noun+CHk
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	DimA3sg;

LEXICON DimA3sg
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
!^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON FeelLike	!! Verb+yAsH
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	FeelLikeA3sg;

LEXICON FeelLikeA3sg
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
!^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
!^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
!^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON Inf1		!! Verb+mAk
^Nflect			#;		!! BUG: only A3sg+Pnon is allowed
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	Inf1A3sg;

LEXICON Inf1A3sg
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
!^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
!^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON Inf2		!! Verb+mA
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	Inf2A3sg;

LEXICON Inf2A3sg
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
!^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
!^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;		!! BUG: This should be possible?
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON Inf3		!! Verb+Hş
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	Inf3A3sg;

LEXICON Inf3A3sg
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON Ness		!! (Noun|Adj)+lHk
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	NessA3sg;

LEXICON NessA3sg
!^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
!^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
!^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
!^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
!^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;



LEXICON NounZero
^Nflect			#;
+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:0	NounZeroA3sg;

LEXICON NounZeroA3sg
^DB+Adj+JustLike:+sH	JustLike;
^DB+Adj+Rel:+ki		Rel;
^DB+Adj+Related:+sAl	Related;
^DB+Adj+With:+lH	With;
^DB+Adj+Without:+sHz	Without;
!^DB+Adverb+Since:+dHr	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+CH	Agt;
^DB+Noun+Dim:+CHk	Dim;
^DB+Noun+Ness:+lHk	Ness;
!^DB+Verb+Acquire:+lAn	Acquire;
!^DB+Verb+Become:+lAş	Become;


LEXICON Acquire
	Verb;

LEXICON Become
	Verb;



LEXICON Verb
	Voice;

LEXICON Voice
			Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+t	Voice3;
^DB+Verb+Recip:+Hş	Voice2;
^DB+Verb+Reflex:+Hn	Voice2;		!! See Issue 8.

LEXICON Voice3
			Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+t	Voice2;

LEXICON Voice2
			Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+t	Voice1;

LEXICON Voice1
			Polarity;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	Polarity;

LEXICON Polarity
+Pos:0			VerbAgt;
+Pos:0			Compound3;
+Neg:+mA		Compound2;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	Compound1;

LEXICON Compound3
^DB+Verb+Start:+yAkoy		Vstem;
^DB+Verb+Stay:+yAkal		Vstem;
^DB+Verb+Almost:+yAyaz		Vstem;
^DB+Verb+EverSince:+yAgel	Vstem;
				Compound2;

LEXICON Compound2
^DB+Verb+Continue:+yAgit	Vstem;  !! BUG:  t-d conversion is not fixed
^DB+Verb+Repeat:+yAdur		Vstem;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver		HastilyNeg?;
				Compound1;

LEXICON Compound1
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil		Vstem;
				Vstem;

LEXICON HastilyNeg?
+Neg:+mA	Vstem;		!! BUG: This is Oflazer's hack, only followed by Aor
		Vstem;	

LEXICON Vstem
^Vflect	#;
	Vderiv;



LEXICON AdjPoss+Pnon
+Pnon:0		#;
		AdjPoss;

LEXICON AdjPoss
+P1sg:+Hm	#;
+P1pl:+HmHz	#;
+P2sg:+Hn	#;
+P2pl:+HnHz	#;	
+P3sg:+sH	#;
+P3pl:+lArH	#;

LEXICON Dat?
^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon+Dat	#;
				#;

LEXICON Vzero?
	Vzero;
	#;

LEXICON Vzero
^DB+Verb+Zero:0	AfterVzero;

LEXICON AfterVzero
^Vzero	#;

LEXICON Nflect
^Nflect	#;

! LEXICON Nzero?
! ^DB+Noun+Zero	Nzero;
! 	#;

! LEXICON Nzero
! ^Nzero	#;

! LEXICON Ness?
! ^DB+Noun+Ness	Nflect;
! 	#;

END
